North Carolina, session 2025, HB295.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 136-19.4A reads as rewritten:
"§ 136-19.4A. Required surveying information in certain acquisition plans.plans;
installation of property-related corner markers.
(a) Surveying Information Required. – The Department of Transportation shall include
in any plan prepared for the purpose of acquiring right-of-way, a permanent easement, or both,
that depicts property lines, right-of-way lines, or permanent easements, a set of drawings that
clearly identify design alignments, baseline control points, found property-related corner
markers, and new right-of-way and permanent easement corner markers. Plans subject to the
requirements of this section shall document the localized coordinates for each major control point
along the design alignments. The coordinates and associated localization metadata shall be based
upon, and tied to, the North Carolina State Plane Coordinate system and shall be clearly identified
within the plans. All property corner markers found found, identified, and surveyed shall be
clearly identified within the plans in accordance with general surveying standards and
procedures. Each property corner marker shall be accurately tied to the design alignment or the
North Carolina State Plane Coordinate system, by either a system of bearings and distances or
by station and offset. For the purposes of this section, the phrase "new right-of-way and
permanent easement corner markers" must include all property boundary intersections along
right-of-way or permanent easements acquired by the Department.
(b) Installation of New Right-of-Way and Permanent Easement Corner Markers. – The
Department of Transportation shall survey and install new right-of-way and permanent easement
corner markers utilizing metal stakes, or materials of comparable permanence, along
right-of-way or permanent easements acquired by the Department, as described in subsection (a)
of this section, in accordance with general surveying standards and procedures after the
completion of a project for which right-of-way or permanent easements were acquired."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies to Department
of Transportation projects initiated on or after that date that require right-of-way or permanent
easement acquisition.
*H295-v-1*